Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.07.025

Referendum.

Upon the filing of a referendum petition in the manner provided in RCW 35A.29.170 signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general municipal election, the resolution authorized by RCW 35A.07.020 shall be referred to the voters for confirmation or rejection in the next general municipal election, if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days from the date of filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be called for that purpose not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred and eighty days from the filing of such referendum petition.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.07.025.]